Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
187A

AQUATIC
RESOURCES

Part I. General Provisions

Section

187A-1 Definitions

187A-1.5 State marine waters

187A-1.6 Applicability of statutes and rules

187A-2 Powers and duties of department

187A-3 Repealed

187A-3.5 Aquaculturist license and license to sell

prohibited aquatic life

187A-4 Administrator

187A-5 Rules

187A-5.5 Consistency of state and federal
fisheries

regulations

187A-6 Special activity permits

187A-6.5 Release and confiscation of harmful
aquatic life

187A-7 Expenditures

187A-8 Cooperation with other governmental
authorities

187A-9 Federal aid in sport fish restoration

187A-9.5 Sport fish special fund

187A-10 Agents to sell licenses

187A-11 Repealed

187A-12 University of Hawaii may use land, etc.

187A-12.4 Misrepresentation or false statement in
receipts

and reports

187A-12.5 General administrative penalties

187A-13 General penalty; community service

187A-14 Informer's fee

187A-15 Rights of inspection of catch

Part II. Fishing Rights

187A-21 Public fishing grounds

187A-22 Use of adjoining lands

187A-23 Konohiki rights

Part III. Alien Aquatic Organisms

187A-31 Definitions

187A-32 Alien aquatic organisms; lead agency;
rules

Part IV. Aquatic Mitigation Banks

187A-41 Aquatic mitigation banking

187A-42 Rules

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Law Journals and Reviews

Protecting Hawai‘i's
Fisheries: Creating an Effective Regulatory Scheme to Sustain Hawai‘i's Fish
Stocks. 29 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next